test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-natew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nâtêw - cut him/her through : # VTA-TS verb - full paradigm; Wolvengrey p. 410; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 91-92, 103-104
  
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: ninâtâw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kinâtâw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: ninâtânân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kinâtânaw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kinâtâwâw
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: ninâtâwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kinâtâwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: ninâtânânak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kinâtânawak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kinâtâwâwak
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kinâsin
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kinâsinân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kinâsinâwâw
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: nâtêw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtêwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nâtêyiwa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: nâtimêw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: nâtimêwak

     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ninâtimâwa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kinâtimâwa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ninâtimânâna
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinâtimânawa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinâtimâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-nâtâw, nikînâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-nâtâw, kikînâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-nâtânân, nikînâtânân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-nâtânaw, kikînâtânaw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-nâtâwâw, kikînâtâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-nâtâwak, nikînâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-nâtâwak, kikînâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-nâtânânak, nikînâtânânak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-nâtânawak, kikînâtânawak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-nâtâwâwak, kikînâtâwâwak]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-nâsin, kikînâtin]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-nâsinân, kikînâtinân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-nâsinâwâw, kikînâtinâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-nâtêw, kînâtêw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-nâtêwak, kînâtêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-nâtêyiwa, kînâtêyiwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-nâtimêw, kînâtimêw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-nâtimêwak, kînâtimêwak]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-nâtimâwa, nikînâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-nâtimâwa, kikînâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-nâtimânâna, nikînâtimânâna]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-nâtimânawa, kikînâtimânawa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-nâtimâwâwa, kikînâtimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-nâtâw, nikanâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-nâtâw, kikanâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-nâtânân, nikanâtânân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-nâtânaw, kikanâtânaw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-nâtâwâw, kikanâtâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-nâtâwak, nikanâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-nâtâwak, kikanâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-nâtânânak, nikanâtânânak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-nâtânawak, kikanâtânawak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-nâtâwâwak, kikanâtâwâwak]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-nâsin, kikanâtin]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-nâsinân, kikanâtinân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-nâsinâwâw, kikanâtinâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-nâtêw, kanâtêw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-nâtêwak, kanâtêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-nâtêyiwa, kanâtêyiwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-nâtimêw, kanâtimêw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-nâtimêwak, kanâtimêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-nâtimâwa, nikanâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-nâtimâwa, kikanâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-nâtimânâna, nikanâtimânâna]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-nâtimânawa, kikanâtimânawa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-nâtimâwâwa, kikanâtimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-nâtâw, niwînâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-nâtâw, kiwînâtâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-nâtânân, niwînâtânân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-nâtânaw, kiwînâtânaw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-nâtâwâw, kiwînâtâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-nâtâwak, niwînâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-nâtâwak, kiwînâtâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-nâtânânak, niwînâtânânak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-nâtânawak, kiwînâtânawak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-nâtâwâwak, kiwînâtâwâwak]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-nâsin, kiwînâtin]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-nâsinân, kiwînâtinân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-nâsinâwâw, kiwînâtinâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêw, wînâtêw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêwak, wînâtêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêyiwa, wînâtêyiwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtimêw, wînâtimêw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtimêwak, wînâtimêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-nâtimâwa, niwînâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-nâtimâwa, kiwînâtimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-nâtimânâna, niwînâtimânâna]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-nâtimânawa, kiwînâtimânawa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-nâtimâwâwa, kiwînâtimâwâwa]
     




     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: ninâtik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kinâtik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: ninâtikonân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kinâtikonaw
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kinâtikowâw
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: ninâtikwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kinâtikwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: ninâtikonânak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kinâtikonawak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kinâtikowâwak
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kinâtitin
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kinâtitinân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kinâtitinâwâw
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: nâtik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: nâtikwak
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtikoyiwa
          
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ninâtikoyiwa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kinâtikoyiwa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ninâtikonâna
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kinâtikonawa
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kinâtikowâwa
     
     
     
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-nâtak, ênâtak]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-nâtat, ênâtat]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-nâtâyâhk, ênâtâyâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-nâtâyahk, ênâtâyahk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-nâtâyêk, ênâtâyêk]
	 
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-nâtakik, ênâtakik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-nâtacik, ênâtacik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-nâtâyâhkik, ênâtâyâhkik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-nâtâyahkok, ênâtâyahkok]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-nâtâyêkok, ênâtâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-nâsiyan, ênâsiyan]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-nâsiyâhk, ênâsiyâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-nâsiyêk, ênâsiyêk]    
     
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtât, ênâtât]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtâcik, ênâtâcik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimât, ênâtimât]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimâcik, ênâtimâcik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtâyit, ênâtâyit]
	 
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimak, ênâtimak]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimat, ênâtimat]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimâyâhk, ênâtimâyâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimâyahk, ênâtimâyahk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtimâyek, ênâtimâyek]
     
     
     
     
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-nâsit, ênâsit]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-nâtisk, ênâtisk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-nâtikoyâhk, ênâtikoyâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-nâtikoyahk, ênâtikoyahk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-nâtikoyek, ênâtikoyek]
	 
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-nâticik, ênâticik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-nâtiskik, ênâtiskik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-nâtikoyâhkik, ênâtikoyâhkik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-nâtikoyahkok, ênâtikoyahkok]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-nâtikoyêkok, ênâtikoyêkok]
	 
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-nâtitân, ênâtitân]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtitâhk, ênâtitâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-nâtitakok, ênâtitakok]
	 
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-nâtikot, ênâtikot]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-nâtikocik, ênâtikocik]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-nâtikoyit, ênâtikoyit]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-nâtiyit, ênâtiyit]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-nâtiyisk, ênâtiyisk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-nâtikoyâhk, ênâtikoyâhk, ê-nâtikowâyâhk, ênâtikowâyâhk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-nâtikoyêk, ênâtikoyêk, ê-nâtikowâyêk, ênâtikowâyêk]
     PV/e+nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-nâtikoyahk, ênâtikoyahk, ê-nâtikowâyahk, ênâtikowâyahk]

     


     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [nâtak, nâtak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [nâtat, nâtat]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [nâtâyâhk, nâtâyâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [nâtâyahk, nâtâyahk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [nâtâyêk, nâtâyêk]

     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [nâtakik, nâtakik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [nâtacik, nâtacik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [nâtâyâhkik, nâtâyâhkik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [nâtâyahkok, nâtâyahkok]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [nâtâyêkok, nâtâyêkok] 
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [nâsiyan, nâsiyan]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [nâsiyâhk, nâsiyâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [nâsiyêk, nâsiyêk]    
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nâtât, nâtât]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtâcik, nâtâcik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [nâtimât, nâtimât]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [nâtimâcik, nâtimâcik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [nâtâyit, nâtâyit]

     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimak, nâtimak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimat, nâtimat]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimâyâhk, nâtimâyâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimâyahk, nâtimâyahk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimâyek, nâtimâyek]
     
     
     
     
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [nâsit, nâsit]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [nâtisk, nâtisk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [nâtikoyâhk, nâtikoyâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [nâtikoyahk, nâtikoyahk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [nâtikoyek, nâtikoyek]
